Colorado, session 2026A, HB1032.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-3-272 as
follows:
42-3-272. Special plates - fallen firefighter.
(1) BEGINNING ON THE EARLIER OF JANUARY 1, 2027, OR WHEN
THE DEPARTMENT IS ABLE TO ISSUE THE PLATES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ISSUE SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES TO QUALIFIED APPLICANTS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION FOR MOTORCYCLES, PASSENGER CARS, TRUCKS, OR
NONCOMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL MOTOR VEHICLES THAT DO NOT
EXCEED SIXTEEN THOUSAND POUNDS EMPTY WEIGHT.
(2) (a) THE FALLEN FIREFIGHTER SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE IS
ESTABLISHED.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE AND USE A DESIGN FOR THE
LICENSE PLATE, WHICH DESIGN MUST CONFORM TO STANDARDS SET BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) (a) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY FIVE YEARS, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL DESIGNATE ONE OR MORE ORGANIZATIONS TO QUALIFY APPLICANTS
TO BE ISSUED THE FALLEN FIREFIGHTER SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE. AN
ORGANIZATION IS ELIGIBLE TO BE DESIGNATED IF THE ORGANIZATION IS A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION EXEMPT FROM TAXATION AND:
(I) IS LOCATED IN COLORADO;
(II) HAS BEEN IN EXISTENCE FOR AT LEAST FIFTEEN YEARS; AND
(III) PROVIDES COUNSELING, SUPPORT, LEGAL AID, EDUCATION
-2- HB26-1032

ASSISTANCE, OR JOB TRAINING TO THE FAMILIES OF FIREFIGHTERS WHO
HAVE DIED IN THE LINE OF DUTY OR OFFERS SCHOLARSHIPS TO THE
CHILDREN OF FALLEN FIREFIGHTERS.
(b) A PERSON MAY APPLY FOR A FALLEN FIREFIGHTER SPECIAL
LICENSE PLATE IF THE PERSON PAYS THE TAXES AND FEES REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION AND PROVIDES TO THE DEPARTMENT A CERTIFICATE
ISSUED BY THE ORGANIZATION DESIGNATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION CONFIRMING THAT THE APPLICANT
HAS MADE A DONATION TO THE ORGANIZATION. THE ORGANIZATION MAY
ESTABLISH A MINIMUM DONATION AMOUNT TO QUALIFY FOR THE LICENSE
PLATE.
(c) THE ORGANIZATION DESIGNATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION SHALL FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT
AN ANNUAL STATEMENT VERIFYING THAT THE ORGANIZATION IS A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(4) THE AMOUNT OF THE TAXES AND FEES REQUIRED FOR SPECIAL
LICENSE PLATES UNDER THIS SECTION IS THE SAME AS THE AMOUNT OF THE
TAXES AND FEES FOR REGULAR MOTOR VEHICLE LICENSE PLATES; EXCEPT
THAT THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE FEE SPECIFIED IN SECTION
42-3-312 AND AN ADDITIONAL ONE-TIME FEE OF TWENTY-FIVE DOLLARS
FOR ISSUANCE OR REPLACEMENT OF THE SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT THE ADDITIONAL ONE-TIME FEE TO THE
STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE FEE TO THE HIGHWAY USERS
TAX FUND CREATED IN SECTION 43-4-201.
(5) AN APPLICANT MAY APPLY FOR PERSONALIZED FALLEN
FIREFIGHTER SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES. UPON PAYMENT OF THE
ADDITIONAL FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 42-3-211 (6)(a) FOR
-3- HB26-1032

PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE THE PLATES
IF THE APPLICANT COMPLIES WITH SECTION 42-3-211. IF AN APPLICANT
HAS EXISTING PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES FOR A MOTOR VEHICLE, THE
APPLICANT MAY TRANSFER THE COMBINATION OF LETTERS OR NUMBERS
TO A NEW SET OF FALLEN FIREFIGHTER SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES FOR THE
VEHICLE UPON PAYING THE FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 42-3-211 (6)(a)
AND UPON TURNING IN THE EXISTING PLATES TO THE DEPARTMENT. A
PERSON THAT HAS OBTAINED PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (5) SHALL PAY THE ANNUAL FEE IMPOSED BY SECTION
42-3-211 (6)(b) FOR RENEWAL OF THE PERSONALIZED PLATES. THE FEES
ASSESSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (5) ARE IN ADDITION TO ALL OTHER
APPLICABLE TAXES AND FEES.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 42-3-312 as
follows:
42-3-312. Special license plate surcharge.
In addition to any other fee imposed by this article 3, an applicant
for a special license plate created by rule in accordance with section
42-3-207, as the section existed when the plate was created, personalized
plates issued under section 42-3-211, or special license plates issued
under sections 42-3-212 to 42-3-214, sections 42-3-217 to 42-3-218,
sections 42-3-221 to 42-3-234 42-3-229, SECTIONS 42-3-231 TO 42-3-234,
sections 42-3-237 to 42-3-258, sections 42-3-260 to 42-3-265, and
sections 42-3-267 to 42-3-271 42-3-272 shall pay an issuance fee of
twenty-five dollars; except that the fee is not imposed on special license
plates exempted from additional fees for the issuance of a military special
license plate by section 42-3-213 (1)(b)(II). The department shall transfer
the money from the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the
-4- HB26-1032

Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211
(2).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1032